Maine, session 132, LD2229.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 10 MRSA §9042, sub-§3-A is enacted to read:
3-A. Electrical and plumbing installation. Electrical installations performed in
accordance with Title 32, section 1201-A, subsection 14 are not subject to inspection by or
on behalf of a municipality at the location where the manufactured housing will be affixed
to real property. Plumbing installations performed in accordance with Title 32, section
3302, subsection 1, paragraph E are not subject to inspection by a municipality or 3rd-party
inspector at the location where the manufactured housing will be affixed to real property.
Sec. 2. 30-A MRSA §4152, sub-§6, as enacted by PL 1987, c. 737, Pt. A, §2 and
Pt. C, §106 and amended by PL 1989, c. 6; c. 9, §2; and c. 104, Pt. C, §§8 and 10, is further
amended to read:
6. Electrical equipment in manufacturer's plant. Any electrical installations or
equipment involved in the manufacture, test or repair of electrical equipment in the
manufacturer's plant; and
Sec. 3. 30-A MRSA §4152, sub-§7, as enacted by PL 1987, c. 737, Pt. A, §2 and
Pt. C, §106 and amended by PL 1989, c. 6; c. 9, §2; and c. 104, Pt. C, §§8 and 10, is further
amended to read:
7. Certain laboratories. Installations in suitable laboratories of exposed electrical
wiring for experimental purposes only.; and
Sec. 4. 30-A MRSA §4152, sub-§8 is enacted to read:
8. Certified manufactured housing. Installations in manufactured housing certified
under Title 10, chapter 951 and rules adopted under that chapter.
Sec. 5. 30-A MRSA §4173, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Manufactured housing excluded. This section does not apply to manufactured
housing constructed or installed in compliance with Title 10, chapter 951 and rules adopted
under that chapter.
Page 1 - 132LR3037(01)

Sec. 6. 30-A MRSA §4215, sub-§1, ¶A, as enacted by PL 1987, c. 737, Pt. A, §2
and Pt. C, §106 and amended by PL 1989, c. 6; c. 9, §2; and c. 104, Pt. C, §§8 and 10, is
further amended to read:
A. The installation of plumbing into a building, except manufactured housing
constructed and installed in compliance with Title 10, chapter 951 and rules adopted
under that chapter;
Sec. 7. 30-A MRSA §4221, sub-§4, ¶B, as amended by PL 2009, c. 344, Pt. D, §6
and affected by Pt. E, §2, is further amended to read:
B. Installation of domestic heating appliances by master oil and solid fuel burning
technicians licensed pursuant to Title 32, chapter 139; and
Sec. 8. 30-A MRSA §4221, sub-§4, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2003, c. 304, §1, is
amended to read:
C. Installation of stand-alone water meters, water meters in combination with
nontestable backflow prevention devices and related valves by water utility personnel
or water utility contractors. The water utility shall include in any notice it provides to
a customer regarding entry to install such a meter or related valves a statement that
installation of a backflow preventor may necessitate installation by the customer of
additional devices, such as an expansion tank, due to thermal expansion.; and
Sec. 9. 30-A MRSA §4221, sub-§4, ¶D is enacted to read:
D. Installation of plumbing in manufactured housing certified under Title 10, chapter
951 and rules adopted under that chapter.
Sec. 10. 32 MRSA §1201-A, sub-§12, as amended by PL 2025, c. 88, §3, is further
amended to read:
12. Incidental work. Regular employees of an owner or a lessee of real property
doing incidental electrical work on that property or incidental electrical work by a person
whose occupation involves miscellaneous jobs of manual labor. For purposes of this
subsection, "incidental electrical work'' means minor electrical work, limited to light
fixtures and switches, that occurs by chance and that does not require electrical installation
calculations; or
Sec. 11. 32 MRSA §1201-A, sub-§13, as enacted by PL 2025, c. 88, §4, is
amended to read:
13. Personal abode. Notwithstanding the requirements set forth in section 1102‑D
for electrical installations in newly constructed single-family dwellings, a person making
electrical installations in an existing single-family dwelling occupied and owned by that
person, as long as the installation conforms with the standards of the National Electrical
Code or other standards approved by the board.; or
Sec. 12. 32 MRSA §1201-A, sub-§14 is enacted to read:
14. Manufactured housing. Electrical installations in manufactured housing as
defined in Title 10, section 9002, subsection 7, when performed by a regular employee of
a manufacturer licensed under Title 10, chapter 951, as long as a master electrician
employed by the manufacturer either supervises or inspects the installation in the
Page 2 - 132LR3037(01)

412 manufacturing facility. The name and license number of the master electrician must be
423 documented on the inspection report of the master electrician.
Sec. 13. 32 MRSA §3302, sub-§1, ¶C, as amended by PL 2017, c. 210, Pt. D, §3,
is further amended to read:
C. Plumbing by a person in a single-family residence occupied or to be occupied by
that person as that person's bona fide personal abode as long as the installation
conforms with board laws and rules; and
Sec. 14. 32 MRSA §3302, sub-§1, ¶D, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 210, Pt. D, §3,
is amended to read:
D. Plumbing by a pump installer who is duly licensed pursuant to section 4700‑I,
subsection 2, except that this exception is limited to installing piping from the cold
water distribution pipe at the pressure tank's main shut-off valve to the existing water
supply piping as long as the piping is located in the same room as the tank, the length
of the piping is no longer than 15 feet and the piping does not extend beyond any
existing branches. Such plumbing must conform to the board's laws and rules.; and
Sec. 15. 32 MRSA §3302, sub-§1, ¶E is enacted to read:
E. Plumbing in manufactured housing as defined in Title 10, section 9002, subsection
7, when performed by a regular employee of a manufacturer licensed under Title 10,
chapter 951, as long as a master plumber employed by the manufacturer either
supervises or inspects the installation in the manufacturing facility. The name and
license number of the master plumber must be documented on the inspection report of
the master plumber.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.